Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.227

Training for interaction with persons with a developmental disability or mental illness.

(1) The commission must offer a training session on law enforcement interaction with persons with a developmental disability or mental illness. The training must be developed by the commission in consultation with appropriate self advocate and family advocate groups and with appropriate community, local, and state organizations and agencies that have expertise in the area of working with persons with a developmental disability or mental illness. In developing the course, the commission must also examine existing courses certified by the commission that relate to persons with a developmental disability or mental illness.

(2) The training must consist of classroom instruction or internet instruction and shall replicate likely field situations to the maximum extent possible. The training should include, at a minimum, core instruction in all of the following:

(a) The cause and nature of mental illnesses and developmental disabilities;

(b) How to identify indicators of mental illness and developmental disability and how to respond appropriately in a variety of common situations;

(c) Conflict resolution and de-escalation techniques for potentially dangerous situations involving persons with a developmental disability or mental illness;

(d) Appropriate language usage when interacting with persons with a developmental disability or mental illness;

(e) Alternatives to lethal force when interacting with potentially dangerous persons with a developmental disability or mental illness; and

(f) Community and state resources available to serve persons with a developmental disability or mental illness and how these resources can be best used by law enforcement to benefit persons with a developmental disability or mental illness in their communities.

(3) The training shall be made available to law enforcement agencies, through electronic means, for use at their convenience and determined by the internal training needs and resources of each agency.

(4) The commission shall make all reasonable efforts to secure private and nonstate public funds to implement this section.

[ 2003 c 270 s 1.]